Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 34.36.2 of Title 62, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, and subsequent


fiscal years, a state agency that is required to provide an itemized


budget request, pursuant to the provisions of Section 34.36 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, may provide to the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services a detailed report


indicating that an efficiency or a waste reduction measure



Req. No. 3529 Page 1


implemented by the agency the previous fiscal year has resulted in


realized cost savings to the agency.


2. Efficiency or waste reduction measures implemented by an


agency shall not:


a. compromise services required by the agency,


b. reduce workforce in a manner that compromises


services, or


c. compromise the health, safety, or welfare of


Oklahomans served by the agency.


B. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall confirm the savings indicated on the report submitted


by such agency and certify such confirmation to the Chair and Vice


Chair of the Legislative Oversight Committee on State Budget


Performance.


C. 1. Certification of such report shall entitle the state


agency to receive ten percent (10%) of the amount of realized cost


savings achieved by the agency as an appropriation.


2. Ten percent (10%) of the amount received by a state agency


under the provisions of paragraph 1 of this subsection may be used


for:


a. bonuses to employees of the agency, or


b. a deposit into pretax retirement accounts of employees


of the agency.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

Req. No. 3529 Page 2


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3529 MSBB 1/14/2026 2:46:06 PM





































Req. No. 3529 Page 3